Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-613
Violation; penalty.

Except as otherwise provided in section 71-649, any person violating any of the provisions of sections 71-601.01 to 71-616 shall be deemed guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VI, art. II, div. IX, § 15, p. 784;

C.S.1922, § 8245;

C.S.1929, § 71-2417;

R.S.1943, § 71-613;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 153;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 26.